test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kielas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kielâs: # 2A
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellas
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kielâsân      # kie´lâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kielâsist     # kie´lâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kielâsáin     # kie´lâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: kielâsin        # [kie´lâsin, kielâsin, kiellâsin]
    kielâs+N+Par: kielâsid        # [kie´lâsid, kielâsid, kiellâsid]
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kielâseh       # kie´lâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kielâsij       # kie´lâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kielâsijd      # kie´lâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kielâsáid      # kie´lâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kielâsijn      # kie´lâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: kielâsijguin   # kie´lâsijguin
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kiellâsijttáá   # kiel´lâsijttáá
